Maryland, session 2026, SB0942.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0942*

SENATE BILL 942
Article – Health – General
10–6A–02.
(b) This subtitle may not be construed to abridge or modify any civil right of the
respondent, including:
(1) Any civil service ranking or appointment;
(2) The right to apply for voluntary admission to a facility under § 10–609
of this title; and
(3) [Any] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN §§ 5–133 AND 5–205 OF THE
PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE AND THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE RELATING TO A
COURT’S ORDER PROHIBITING POSSESSION OF A FIREARM, ANY right relating to a
license, permit, certification, privilege, or benefit under any law.
10–6A–08.
(a) If, after hearing all relevant evidence, the court does not find by clear and
convincing evidence that the respondent meets the criteria for assisted outpatient
treatment, the court shall deny the petition.
(b) (1) If, after hearing all relevant evidence, the court finds by clear and
convincing evidence that the respondent meets the criteria for assisted outpatient
treatment, the court shall order the respondent to comply with assisted outpatient
treatment for a period not to exceed 1 year.
(2) The order of the court shall incorporate a treatment plan that:
(i) Is limited in scope to the elements included in the treatment plan
presented to the court under § 10–6A–06 of this subtitle; and
(ii) Includes only those elements that the court finds by clear and
convincing evidence to be essential to the maintenance of the respondent’s health or safety.
10–6A–08.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FIREARM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF
THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(B) (1) IF A COURT ORDERS A RESPONDENT TO COMPLY WITH ASSISTED
OUTPATIENT TREATMENT UNDER § 10–6A–08 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COURT SHALL
MAKE A DETERMINATION AS TO WHETHER THE RESPONDENT IS LIKELY TO
ENDANGER OR CAUSE PHYSICAL INJURY TO THE RESPONDENT OR ANOTHER IF THE
RESPONDENT HAS ACCESS TO A FIREARM.

SENATE BILL 942 3
(2) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT THE RESPONDENT IS LIKELY TO
ENDANGER OR CAUSE PHYSICAL INJURY TO THE RESPONDENT OR ANOTHER IF THE
RESPONDENT HAS ACCESS TO A FIREARM, THE COURT SHALL ORDER THE
RESPONDENT:
(I) TO SURRENDER TO LAW ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITIES ANY
FIREARM IN THE RESPONDENT’S POSSESSION; AND
(II) NOT TO PURCHASE OR POSSESS ANY FIREARM FOR THE
DURATION OF THE ORDER REQUIRING THE RESPONDENT TO COMPLY WITH
ASSISTED OUTPATIENT TREATMENT.
(C) (1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF § 1–203 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE, ON APPLICATION BY A STATE’S ATTORNEY OR A
LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WITH PROBABLE CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT A
RESPONDENT WHO IS SUBJECT TO AN ORDER UNDER THIS SECTION POSSESSES A
FIREARM AND FAILED TO SURRENDER THE FIREARM, A COURT MAY ISSUE A SEARCH
WARRANT FOR THE REMOVAL OF THE FIREARM AT ANY LOCATION IDENTIFIED IN
THE APPLICATION FOR THE WARRANT.
(2) (I) A COURT MAY ENFORCE AN ORDER UNDER THIS SECTION
THROUGH ITS CONTEMPT POWERS.
(II) THE COURT MAY IMPOSE ANY REASONABLE SANCTION FOR
A VIOLATION OF ITS ORDER UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) AN ORDER UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL EXPIRE
WHEN THE RESPONDENT IS NO LONGER SUBJECT TO AN ORDER TO COMPLY WITH
ASSISTED OUTPATIENT TREATMENT UNDER § 10–6A–08 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) IF A RESPONDENT SURRENDERS A FIREARM UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION, A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE TO THE RESPONDENT INFORMATION ON THE PROCESS
FOR RETAKING POSSESSION OF THE FIREARM; AND
(2) TRANSPORT AND STORE THE FIREARM IN A PROTECTIVE CASE, IF
ONE IS AVAILABLE, AND IN A MANNER INTENDED TO PREVENT DAMAGE TO THE
FIREARM DURING THE TIME THE ORDER UNDER THIS SECTION IS IN EFFECT.
(F) THE RESPONDENT MAY RETAKE POSSESSION OF A SURRENDERED
FIREARM AT THE EXPIRATION OF THE COURT’S ORDER UNDER THIS SECTION,

SENATE BILL 942
UNLESS THE RESPONDENT IS NOT OTHERWISE LEGALLY ENTITLED TO OWN OR
POSSESS THE FIREARM.
(G) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, A RESPONDENT MAY TRANSPORT
A FIREARM IF THE RESPONDENT IS CARRYING AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS
SECTION AND:
(1) THE FIREARM IS UNLOADED;
(2) THE RESPONDENT HAS NOTIFIED THE LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT,
BARRACKS, OR STATION THAT THE FIREARM IS BEING TRANSPORTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE COURT’S ORDER; AND
(3) THE RESPONDENT TRANSPORTS THE FIREARM DIRECTLY TO THE
LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT, BARRACKS, OR STATION.
(H) (1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO TAKES POSSESSION OF A
FIREARM IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN ORDER UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL, AT THE
TIME THE FIREARM OR AMMUNITION IS SURRENDERED OR SEIZED:
(I) ISSUE A RECEIPT IDENTIFYING, BY MAKE, MODEL, AND
SERIAL NUMBER, ALL FIREARMS THAT HAVE BEEN SURRENDERED OR SEIZED;
(II) PROVIDE A COPY OF THE RECEIPT TO THE RESPONDENT;
(III) RETAIN A COPY OF THE RECEIPT; AND
(IV) PROVIDE INFORMATION TO THE RESPONDENT ON THE
PROCESS FOR RETAKING POSSESSION OF THE FIREARMS ON THE EXPIRATION OF
THE ORDER.
(2) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL TRANSPORT AND STORE
ANY FIREARM SURRENDERED OR SEIZED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN ORDER UNDER
THIS SECTION:
(I) IN A PROTECTIVE CASE, IF ONE IS AVAILABLE; AND
(II) IN A MANNER INTENDED TO PREVENT DAMAGE TO THE
FIREARM DURING THE TIME THE ORDER IS IN EFFECT.
(3) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY NOT PLACE ANY MARK ON A
SEIZED OR SURRENDERED FIREARM FOR IDENTIFICATION OR OTHER PURPOSES.

SENATE BILL 942 5
(4) (I) ON EXPIRATION OR TERMINATION OF AN ORDER UNDER
THIS SECTION, A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT HOLDS A FIREARM
SURRENDERED OR SEIZED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE ORDER SHALL NOTIFY THE
RESPONDENT THAT THE RESPONDENT MAY REQUEST THE RETURN OF THE
FIREARM.
(II) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL RETURN A FIREARM
TO A RESPONDENT ONLY AFTER THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY VERIFIES THAT
THE RESPONDENT IS NOT OTHERWISE PROHIBITED FROM POSSESSING THE
FIREARM.
(III) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, ON
REQUEST OF THE RESPONDENT, A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL RETURN ALL
FIREARMS BELONGING TO THE RESPONDENT NOT LATER THAN 48 HOURS AFTER
THE EXPIRATION OF AN ORDER UNDER THIS SECTION.
(5) (I) A RESPONDENT WHO DOES NOT WISH TO RECOVER A
FIREARM OR AMMUNITION SEIZED OR SURRENDERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN
ORDER UNDER THIS SECTION OR WHO IS PROHIBITED FROM POSSESSING FIREARMS
UNDER TITLE 5 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE MAY:
1. SELL OR TRANSFER TITLE TO THE FIREARM TO:
A. A LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER; OR
B. ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT PROHIBITED
FROM POSSESSING THE FIREARM UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW AND WHO DOES
NOT LIVE IN THE SAME RESIDENCE AS THE RESPONDENT; OR
2. REQUEST THE DESTRUCTION OF THE FIREARM.
(II) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL TRANSFER
POSSESSION OF A FIREARM OR AMMUNITION TO A LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER OR
AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1B OF THIS PARAGRAPH ONLY
AFTER:
1. THE LICENSED FIREARMS DEALER OR INDIVIDUAL
PROVIDES WRITTEN PROOF THAT THE RESPONDENT HAS AGREED TO TRANSFER THE
FIREARM TO THE DEALER OR INDIVIDUAL; AND
2. THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY VERIFIES THE
AGREEMENT WITH THE RESPONDENT.

SENATE BILL 942
(III) ON REQUEST OF THE RESPONDENT, A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY MAY DESTROY FIREARMS SEIZED OR SURRENDERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
AN ORDER UNDER THIS SECTION.
(6) IF AN INDIVIDUAL OTHER THAN THE RESPONDENT CLAIMS
OWNERSHIP OF A FIREARM SEIZED OR SURRENDERED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN
ORDER UNDER THIS SECTION, THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL RETURN THE
FIREARM TO THE INDIVIDUAL IF:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL PROVIDES PROOF OF OWNERSHIP OF THE
FIREARM; AND
(II) THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY DETERMINES THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL IS NOT PROHIBITED FROM POSSESSING THE FIREARM OR AMMUNITION.
(7) IF A FIREARM IS NOT RECLAIMED WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE
PROVISION OF NOTICE TO A RESPONDENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION:
(I) NO PARTY SHALL HAVE THE RIGHT TO ASSERT OWNERSHIP
OF THE FIREARM; AND
(II) THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY HOLDING THE FIREARM
MAY DESTROY THE FIREARM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective until the taking effect of the termination provision
specified in Section 3 of Chapter 704 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2024. If that
termination provision takes effect, this Act shall be abrogated and of no further force and
effect. This Act may not be interpreted to have any effect on that termination provision.